District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.63

Conciliation agreements.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for a party to a conciliation agreement, made under the provisions of this chapter, to violate the terms of such agreement.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 263, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2527.
1973 Ed., § 6-2273.